South Carolina, session 2025-2026, H3754.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the State of South Carolina: SECTION 1.  Section 20-3-130 of the S.C. Code is amended by adding: (I) Either party has the right to have the final hearing in an action filed pursuant to this chapter heard by a judge and jury, with the judge deciding questions of law and the jury deciding questions of fact, and, to exercise the right, shall file an appropriate request with the court indicating that the party requests a trial by jury. SECTION 2.  This act takes effect upon approval by the Governor. ----XX----